Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.060

Scope of authority's powers—Duties of other agencies.

(1) The authority is authorized to participate fully in federal and other governmental economic development finance programs and to take such actions as are necessary and consistent with this chapter to secure to itself and the people of the state the benefits of those programs and to meet their requirements.

(2) The authority shall coordinate its programs with those contributing to a common purpose found elsewhere in the departments of *community, trade, and economic development, agriculture or employment security, or any other department or organization of, or affiliated with, the state or federal government, and shall avoid any duplication of such activities or programs provided elsewhere. The departments of *community, trade, and economic development, agriculture, employment security and other relevant state agencies shall provide to the authority all reports prepared in the course of their ongoing activities which may assist in the identification of unmet capital financing needs by small-sized and medium-sized businesses in the state.

[ 1995 c 399 s 90; 1989 c 279 s 7.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "department of community, trade, and economic development" was renamed the "department of commerce" by 2009 c 565.